Louisiana, session 2026, HB693.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:274.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§274.4. Placing of legislator district signs; contracts with third parties
A.(1) The department may regulate the content, composition, placement,
erection, and maintenance of the legislator district signs within interstate and other
fully controlled access highway rights-of-way, or the department may contract with
a qualified third party or parties for the placement, erection, and maintenance of the
legislator district signs within interstate and other fully controlled access highway
rights-of-way. The department may expend any available federal funds for erecting
and maintaining the legislator district signs.
(2) If the department contracts with a qualified third party for the placement,
erection, and maintenance of the legislator district signs within interstate or other
fully controlled access highway rights-of-way, selection of the qualified third party
shall be made pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 39:1554(B). The department and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1279 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 693
the qualified third party shall negotiate the terms and conditions of their contract;
however, the qualified third party shall be required to deposit all revenues received
pursuant to the contract into a separate account and provide the department with a
full accounting of such revenues every three months. The department may extend
the initial term of the contract for not more than four additional five-year periods.
(3) For purposes of this Section "legislator district signs" shall mean a
rectangular sign panel imprinted with the names of the respective legislators' names
and the district number on each sign as provided for in administrative rules
promulgated pursuant to this Section.
(4) The department shall establish appropriate and reasonable fees.
(5) The ownership of the legislator district signs erected and maintained by
a qualified third party shall be the property of the state of Louisiana.
B. All fees collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be
considered as self-generated revenues and deposited by the secretary of the
Department of Transportation and Development into the state treasury for credit to
the Department of Transportation and Development. After compliance with the
requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana relative
to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund, the monies so deposited shall be
appropriated as self-generated revenues to the Department of Transportation and
Development.
C.(1) The procedures for obtaining approval for programming, project
authorizations, and other actions for federal-aid projects which include these signs
shall follow the same procedures as other federal-aid projects in this state, as
prescribed in Title 23 of the Code of Federal Regulations Subpart C of Section 655
et seq.
(2) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary for the implementation of
this Section, including but not limited to rules and regulations relative to contracting
with a qualified third party.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1279 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 693